Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1341.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XV-OCOMMUNITY-ENGAGED SCHOOLSSection 1501-O. Scope of article.This article relates to the Community-Engaged School for Success Pilot Program.Section 1502-O. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 123456789101112131415161718192021 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Community-engaged school." A school that is designated by the secretary to participate in the program and is engaged in developing and implementing a community engagement plan to provide engaged student support services."Community partner." A community group, parent organization, early childhood learning program, business organization, dental care provider, health care provider, mental health provider, civic organization, local governmental agency, school employee organization, institution of higher education or other organization that is able to provide engaged student support services to students in a school setting."Coordinator." An individual who works full time within a community-engaged school, in consultation with school leaders and staff, to promote and coordinate the provision of engaged student support services."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Engaged student support services." Supplemental services provided by school personnel or community partners, or both, to students in a school setting that remove academic and nonacademic barriers to success but do not supplant services provided under the terms of a collective bargaining agreement entered into in accordance with the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act. The term includes the following services:(1) Academic assistance.(2) Behavior interventions.(3) Community and service learning.(4) Family engagement.20260SB1341PN1734 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Mental health services.(6) Health care services.(7) Dental health services.(8) Basic needs.(9) College and career preparation.(10) Enrichment activities.(11) Life skills."Program." The Community-Engaged School for Success Pilot Program established under section 1503-O."Program manager." A nonprofit community-based organization that works on behalf of a community-engaged school or schools to identify, implement, manage and evaluate the provision of engaged student support services to students."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth.Section 1503-O. Community-Engaged School for Success Pilot Program.The Community-Engaged School for Success Pilot Program is established under the department.Section 1504-O. Community-engaged school eligibility.Any school operated by a school district in this Commonwealth is eligible for designation by the secretary as a community-engaged school if it meets at least one of the following criteria:(1) The school is ranked in the lowest 15% of the school's designation as an elementary school or a secondary school based on combined mathematics and reading scores from the annual assessment administered in the previous school year.(2) The school is located in a school district where the acute poverty percentage as calculated under section 2502.53 20260SB1341PN1734 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is equal to or greater than 30%, and the school's enrollment is representative of the school district's acute poverty percentage.Section 1505-O. Community-engaged school designation.(a) Application.--A school that seeks to be designated as a community-engaged school must submit an application to the department in a form and with information as determined by the department.(b) Duty of secretary.--No later than September 30, 2026, the secretary shall designate no less than 20 schools that have applied for designation under this article as community-engaged schools.(c) Requirements of designees.--A school designated by the secretary as a community-engaged school shall:(1) Appoint a program manager for the school within 90 days of the designation.(2) Appoint a coordinator for the school within 90 days of the designation.(3) Develop, implement and carry out the provisions of a community engagement plan approved by the secretary.Section 1506-O. Community engagement plan.(a) Development.--The community engagement plan of a community-engaged school shall include the following:(1) An evaluation and analysis of indicators of school and student performance needs that includes the following:(i) Academic performance, including achievement and growth.(ii) Graduation and promotion rates.(iii) Chronic absenteeism.(iv) Disciplinary information.20260SB1341PN1734 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) School safety information.(vi) Unique student populations.(vii) Other factors and information necessary to identify academic and nonacademic barriers to success in school.(2) A qualitative and quantitative analysis that assesses areas of need through surveys, forums and focus groups with parents and other stakeholders, including the following:(i) Student needs regarding food, clothing, shelter and employment.(ii) Student needs and access to health care services, mental health services and behavior health services.(iii) Family literacy.(iv) Student and parent access to job training and placement programs.(v) Student access to early childhood education.(vi) Family engagement in school activities.(vii) Student engagement in out-of-school academic programs.(viii) School culture and climate.(ix) School safety.(x) An evaluation of current programs and services currently provided by the community-engaged school.(xi) Other factors and information necessary to identify academic and nonacademic barriers to success in the community-engaged school.(b) Plan submission to secretary.--No later than March 30, 2027, a community-engaged school shall utilize the results of 20260SB1341PN1734 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the evaluation and analysis in subsection (a) and submit a community engagement plan to the secretary for approval. The community engagement plan shall include the following:(1) An organizational chart for the community-engaged school that reflects upon the relationship of school leadership, staff, coordinator and program manager.(2) A list of areas of need and any academic and nonacademic barriers to achievement.(3) A list of the specific engaged student support services and programs to be provided to students, including:(i) The community partners providing the services and programs.(ii) A description of the services and programs to be provided.(4) Performance goals and benchmarks to measure academic performance and other areas of need.(5) Procedures to formally evaluate performance.(6) A plan for reporting progress and outcomes related to the services and programs provided in the community engagement plan on an annual basis to the school board of directors and the department no later than August 31 of each year. The plan shall include at least five measurable indicators to gauge the success of the services and programs. The measurable indicators may include the following:(i) The number and percentage of students who remained in school.(ii) The number and percentage of students who were promoted to the next grade level.(iii) The number and percentage of students who graduated.20260SB1341PN1734 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) The number and percentage of students who met their attendance goal.(v) The number and percentage of students who met their academic goal.(vi) The number and percentage of students who met their behavioral goal.(7) A budget approved by the school board of directors to accomplish the community engagement plan that identifies the resources allocated to support the community-engaged school and its community engagement plan.(8) Policies and procedures to ensure appropriate data sharing with the coordinator, program manager and community partner.(9) Other items required by the secretary to ensure the success of the community engagement plan.(c) Plan approval.--(1) Within 30 days of receipt of the community engagement plan, the secretary shall approve the community engagement plan or notify the school district that revisions to the community engagement plan are needed and transmit suggested revisions to the board of school directors.(2) A community engagement plan that is denied by the secretary may be revised and resubmitted at the direction of the secretary.Section 1507-O. Duties of program manager.The duties of the program manager shall include the following:(1) The development of the evaluation and analysis of indicators of student performance needs under section 1506-O(a).20260SB1341PN1734 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The development of a site plan to be provided to the community-engaged school within 90 days of the appointment of the program manager. The site plan shall include the following:(i) A summary of the needs identified under section 1506-O(a).(ii) The goals and measures for addressing the identified needs of the community-engaged school.(iii) The manner in which the program manager will work cooperatively with staff of the community-engaged school.(3) The development of the annual report under section 1506-O(b)(6).Section 1508-O. Duties of department.(a) Application.--The department shall develop an application process for a school district to apply on behalf of an eligible school under section 1504-O for designation as a community-engaged school.(b) Program guidelines.--Within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall develop guidelines specifying minimum quality standards for an organization to qualify as a program manager under this article.(c) Technical assistance.-- (1) The department shall provide technical assistance to community-engaged schools, including academic expertise and assistance, training, program design, grant writing assistance and data collection and analysis.(2) The department may enter into a contract to provide the technical assistance required under paragraph (1).(d) Best practices.--The department shall facilitate the 20260SB1341PN1734 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sharing of best practices among community-engaged schools and with other schools in this Commonwealth. In sharing best practices under this subsection, the department shall ensure compliance with all student privacy laws, including 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights).(e) Annual report.--No later than December 31, 2027, and each year thereafter, the department shall submit an annual report of the information collected from the community-engaged schools under section 1506-O(b)(6) to the Governor, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives. The department shall post the annual report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 1509-O . Community-engaged school grants. (a) Amount.--The department may award community-engaged school grants to school districts on behalf of schools designated as community-engaged schools upon approval of the school's community engagement plan. The amount of the grant under this section may not exceed $125,000 for each community-engaged school.(b) Matching requirement.--A school district must match the amount of the grant with school district money at least equal to the State allocation.(c) Duration.--To the extent that funding for grants is available and the school continues to follow its community engagement plan to the secretary's satisfaction, an annual award 20260SB1341PN1734 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be made in five consecutive years.(d) Limitation.--No school district may receive an annual grant allocation that exceeds 10% of the money available under the program.(e) Diversity.--The secretary shall ensure that the grant funding under this program is geographically dispersed throughout this Commonwealth.(f) Use and audit.--Grant money shall be used exclusively for the purpose of supporting a community-engaged school's community engagement plan and are subject to audit by the department and the Auditor General.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1341PN1734 - 10 - 123456789101112